Utah statutes.
23-21-2.2.   Preparation of management plans -- Participation by interested persons and local and tribal governments -- Compatibility with local government plans and existing rights.

(1)  The division shall invite persons who may have an interest in how the land is managed to participate in the management planning process.

(2)  Those persons may include:

(a)  persons who use, or may use, the land for:

(i)  agriculture, mining, or other commercial pursuits;

(ii)  hunting or fishing;

(iii)  recreation; or

(iv)  other uses;

(b)  adjacent or nearby landowners or residents; or

(c)  other interested parties.

(3)  The division shall invite local government officials to participate in the management planning process.

(4)  In preparing a management plan, the division shall seek to make land uses compatible with:

(a)  local government general plans and zoning and land use ordinances; and

(b)  existing rights of others within the area.

(5) (a)  If the land is located within or adjacent to tribal lands, the division shall invite tribal government officials to participate in the management planning process.

(b)  Participation by tribal officials in the development of management plans for lands owned by the division does not waive the tribe's sovereignty.



Enacted by Chapter 218, 1998 General Session

